New York, session 2025-2026, S10262.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that the enactment of these appropriations provides sufficient 3 authority to the comptroller for the purpose of making payments for the 4 purposes described herein until such time as appropriation bills submit- 5 ted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the state constitution 6 for the support of government for the state fiscal year beginning April 7 1, 2026 are enacted. 8 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 9 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 10 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 2. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 12 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 13 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 14 public officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be 15 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 16 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 17 For the purpose of making payments for 18 personal service, including liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12040-01-6 S. 10262 2 1 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 2 period April 1 through May [11] 14, 2026 3 to state officers and employees of the 4 executive branch, including the governor, 5 lieutenant governor, comptroller, and 6 attorney general, and to employees of the 7 legislature. This appropriation also 8 includes payments for services performed 9 by mentally ill or developmentally disa- 10 bled persons who are employed in state-op- 11 erated special employment, work-for-pay or 12 sheltered workshop programs .............. 13 .......................... [1,799,296,469] 2,053,493,041 14 -------------- 15 § 3. Section 3 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 16 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 17 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 § 3. The amount specified in this section, or so much thereof as shall 19 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, is hereby appropri- 20 ated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the public 21 officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be available 22 for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 23 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 24 For the payment of state operations non 25 personal service liabilities to the execu- 26 tive branch, including the comptroller, 27 and the attorney general, and legislature, 28 incurred in the ordinary course of busi- 29 ness, during the period April 1 through 30 May [11] 14, 2026, pursuant to existing 31 state law and for purposes for which the 32 legislature authorized the expenditure of 33 moneys during the 2025-2026 state fiscal 34 year; provided, however, that nothing 35 contained herein shall be deemed to limit 36 or restrict the power or authority of 37 state departments or agencies to conduct 38 their activities or operations in accord- 39 ance with existing law, and further 40 provided that nothing contained herein 41 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify or 42 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 43 state finance law prescribing when appro- 44 priations made for the 2025-2026 state 45 fiscal year shall have ceased to have 46 force and effect ............. [56,000,000] 66,000,000 47 -------------- 48 § 4. Section 4 of chapter 102 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 49 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 50 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 51 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 52 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby S. 10262 3 1 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 2 respective public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount 3 shall be available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 4 MISCELLANEOUS - - ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 5 The sum of ten million dollars 6 ($10,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 7 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 8 designated, is hereby appropriated for 9 contracts and grants approved for purposes 10 for which the legislature authorized the 11 expenditures of money during the 2025-2026 12 fiscal year. An amount up to ten million 13 dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available 14 for the payment of capital projects 15 liabilities incurred during the period 16 from April 1 through May [11] 14, 2026 for 17 contracts and grants approved prior to 18 April 1, 2026, provided, however, that 19 nothing contained herein shall be deemed 20 to limit or restrict the power or authori- 21 ty of state departments or agencies to 22 conduct their activities or operations in 23 accordance with existing law, and further 24 provided that nothing contained herein 25 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify, or 26 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 27 state finance law prescribing when appro- 28 priations made for the 2025-2026 fiscal 29 year shall have ceased to have force and 30 effect ...................................... 10,000,000 31 -------------- 32 § 5. Section 5 of chapter 102 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 33 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 34 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 36 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 37 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 38 respective public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount 39 shall be available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 40 MISCELLANEOUS - - ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 41 The sum of twenty million dollars 42 ($20,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 43 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 44 designated, is hereby appropriated for 45 contracts and grants approved for purposes 46 for which the legislature authorized the 47 expenditures of money during the 2025-2026 48 fiscal year. An amount up to twenty 49 million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be 50 available for the payment of capital 51 projects liabilities incurred during the S. 10262 4 1 period from April 1 through May [11] 14, 2 2026 for contracts and grants approved 3 after April 1, 2026, provided, however, 4 that nothing contained herein shall be 5 deemed to limit or restrict the power or 6 authority of state departments or agencies 7 to conduct their activities or operations 8 in accordance with existing law, and 9 further provided that nothing contained 10 herein shall be deemed to supersede, 11 nullify, or modify the provisions of 12 section 40 of the state finance law 13 prescribing when appropriations made for 14 the 2025-2026 fiscal year shall have 15 ceased to have force and effect ............ 20,000,000 16 -------------- 17 § 6. Section 4 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 18 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 19 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 21 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 22 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 23 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 24 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 25 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 26 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 27 STATE OPERATIONS 28 GENERAL STATE CHARGES ....................... [814,763,000] 836,942,500 29 -------------- 30 General Fund 31 State Purposes Account - 10050 32 For employee fringe benefits according to 33 the following project schedule including 34 those benefits which are related to 35 employees paid from funds, accounts, or 36 programs where the division of the budget 37 has issued waivers (85022) .. [799,145,000] 821,324,500 38 Project Schedule 39 PROJECT AMOUNT 40 -------------------------------------------- 41 For the state's contribution 42 to the health insurance fund 43 and deposit into the retiree 44 health benefit trust fund 45 pursuant to section 99-aa of 46 the state finance law. The 47 state's share of the health 48 insurance program dividends S. 10262 5 1 shall be available to pay 2 for the premiums in 2026-27 .. 514,422,000 3 For the state's contribution 4 to the social security 5 contribution fund .......... 6 ............... [171,000,000] 192,500,000 7 For payments to the state 8 insurance fund for workers' 9 compensation benefits and 10 other related workers' 11 compensation costs prior to 12 or after they become 13 incurred including but not 14 limited to the benefits 15 defined in chapters 302 and 16 303 of the laws of 1985 ....... 55,000,000 17 For the state's contribution 18 to employee benefit fund 19 programs ...................... 40,500,000 20 For the state's contribution 21 to the dental insurance plan ... 7,415,000 22 For the payment of the metro- 23 politan commuter transporta- 24 tion mobility tax pursuant 25 to article 23 of the tax 26 law, as added by chapter 25 27 of the laws of 2009, on 28 behalf of the state employ- 29 ees employed in the metro- 30 politan commuter transporta- 31 tion district ... [7,005,000] 7,680,000 32 For the state's share of 33 contributions to the volun- 34 tary defined contribution 35 plan made on behalf of 36 eligible employees pursuant 37 to chapter 18 of the laws 38 of 2012 who elect to partic- 39 ipate in such plan and who 40 are not otherwise eligi- 41 ble to participate in the 42 SUNY optional retirement 43 program ......... [1,059,000] 1,063,500 44 For reimbursement to the unem- 45 ployment insurance fund for 46 payments made to claimants 47 formerly employed by the 48 state of New York .............. 2,000,000 49 For the state's contribution 50 to the vision care plan .......... 744,000 51 -------------- 52 Project schedule total ... 53 ........... [799,145,000] 821,324,500 54 -------------- S. 10262 6 1 For payments in accordance with section 19-a 2 of the public lands law (80567) .............. 7,720,000 3 For the payment in-lieu of taxes to the city 4 of Albany for certain state-owned land 5 pursuant to section 19-a of the public 6 lands law. Provided however, notwithstand- 7 ing paragraph (4) of subdivision 2-a of 8 section 19-a of the public lands law, such 9 funds may be paid prior to October 1, 2026 10 (80567) ...................................... 7,720,000 11 For payment of claims for damage to personal 12 or real property or for bodily injuries or 13 wrongful death caused by officers, employ- 14 ees, or other authorized persons providing 15 service to state government while provid- 16 ing such service, and the state university 17 construction fund while acting within the 18 scope of their employment, and while oper- 19 ating motor vehicles, and for any individ- 20 uals operating motor vehicles which are 21 assigned on a permanent basis with unre- 22 stricted use to state officers and employ- 23 ees when the person is permanently 24 assigned the motor vehicle (80559) ............. 178,000 25 -------------- 26 § 7. Section 5 of chapter 100 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 27 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 28 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 30 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 31 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 32 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 33 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 34 JUDICIARY 35 For the purpose of making payments for 36 personal service, including liabilities 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the 38 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 39 period April 1 through May [11] 14, 2026 40 to officers and employees of the judiciary 41 ............................................ 269,000,000 42 For the payment of state operations nonper- 43 sonal service liabilities, the sum of 44 thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000), 45 or so much thereof as shall be sufficient 46 to accomplish the purpose designated, is 47 hereby appropriated to the judiciary out 48 of any moneys in the general fund or other 49 funds to the credit of the state purposes 50 account not otherwise appropriated. The 51 comptroller is hereby authorized and 52 directed to utilize this appropriation for S. 10262 7 1 the purpose of making payments for nonper- 2 sonal service liabilities incurred by the 3 judiciary from April 1 through May [11] 4 14, 2026 .................................... 36,000,000 5 For the payment of aid to localities liabil- 6 ities, the sum of twenty-two million 7 dollars ($22,000,000), or so much thereof 8 as shall be sufficient to accomplish the 9 purpose designated, is hereby appropriated 10 to the judiciary out of any moneys in the 11 general fund or other funds to the credit 12 of the state purposes account not other- 13 wise appropriated. The comptroller is 14 hereby authorized and directed to utilize 15 this appropriation for the purpose of 16 making payments for aid to localities 17 liabilities incurred by the judiciary from 18 April 1 through May [11] 14, 2026 ........... 22,000,000 19 For the payment of employee fringe benefit 20 programs including, but not limited to, 21 the judiciary's contributions to the 22 health insurance fund, the employees' 23 retirement system pension accumulation 24 fund, the social security contribution 25 fund, employee benefit fund programs, the 26 dental insurance plan, the vision care 27 plan, the unemployment insurance fund, and 28 for workers' compensation benefits, the 29 sum of one hundred fifteen million seven 30 hundred fifty thousand dollars 31 ($115,750,000), or so much thereof as 32 shall be sufficient to accomplish the 33 purpose designated, is hereby appropriated 34 to the judiciary out of any moneys in the 35 general fund or other funds to the credit 36 of the state purposes account not other- 37 wise appropriated. The comptroller is 38 hereby authorized and directed to utilize 39 this appropriation for the purpose of 40 making payments for employee fringe bene- 41 fit liabilities incurred by the judiciary 42 from April 1 through May [11] 14, 2026 ..... 115,750,000 43 -------------- 44 § 8. Section 8 of chapter 102 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 45 appropriations for the support of government, is amended to read as 46 follows: 47 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 48 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 49 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 50 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 51 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 52 OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERIVCES 53 AID TO LOCALITIES S. 10262 8 1 ADOPTION SUBSIDY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM .......... [20,340,000] 40,680,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 Local Assistance Account - 10000 5 For services and expenses for the adoption 6 subsidy program pursuant to title 9 of 7 article 6 of the social services law. 8 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 9 of law, the liability of the state to 10 social services districts and the amount 11 to be distributed or otherwise expended by 12 the state to reimburse social services 13 districts pursuant to section 456 of the 14 social services law shall be 62 percent of 15 eligible social services district expendi- 16 tures. 17 The amount hereby appropriated is to be 18 available for payment of aid heretofore 19 accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 20 palities. Subject to the approval of the 21 director of the budget, such funds shall 22 be available to the office net of disal- 23 lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and 24 credits. 25 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 26 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 27 be transferred to any other appropriation 28 within the office of children and family 29 services and/or the office of temporary 30 and disability assistance and/or suballo- 31 cated to the office of temporary and disa- 32 bility assistance for the purpose of 33 paying local social services districts' 34 costs of the above program and may be 35 increased or decreased by interchange with 36 any other appropriation or with any other 37 item or items within the amounts appropri- 38 ated within the office of children and 39 family services general fund - local 40 assistance account with the approval of 41 the director of the budget who shall file 42 such approval with the department of audit 43 and control and copies thereof with the 44 chairman of the senate finance committee 45 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 46 means committee. 47 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 48 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 49 the social services law, or payments of 50 federal funds otherwise due to the local 51 social services districts for programs 52 provided under the federal social security 53 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 54 herein appropriated, in amounts certified S. 10262 9 1 by the state commissioner or the state 2 commissioner of health as due from local 3 social services districts each month as 4 their share of payments made pursuant to 5 section 367-b of the social services law 6 may be set aside by the state comptroller 7 in an interest-bearing account with such 8 interest accruing to the credit of the 9 locality in order to ensure the orderly 10 and prompt payment of providers under 11 section 367-b of the social services law 12 pursuant to an estimate provided by the 13 commissioner of health of each local 14 social services district's share of 15 payments made pursuant to section 367-b of 16 the social services law. 17 The amounts appropriated herein shall be 18 available for reimbursement of local 19 district claims only to the extent that 20 such claims are submitted within twenty- 21 four months of the last day of the state 22 fiscal year in which the expenditures were 23 incurred, unless waived for good cause by 24 the commissioner subject to the approval 25 of the director of the budget. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 27 of law including, but not limited to, any 28 chapter of the laws of 2026 which enacts a 29 targeted inflationary increase for the 30 state fiscal year beginning on April 1, 31 2026, the commissioner shall continue to 32 apply any targeted inflationary increase 33 in effect on March 31, 2026 for the entire 34 rate year that began when such cost of 35 living adjustment increase was in effect. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, amounts due and owing to 38 a social services district under this 39 appropriation, may be reduced up to such 40 amounts due and owing to the state under 41 section 529 of the executive law (13917) . 42 .............................. [20,340,000] 40,680,000 43 -------------- 44 § 9. Section 9 of chapter 102 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 45 appropriations for the support of government, is amended to read as 46 follows: 47 § 9. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 48 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 49 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 50 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 51 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 52 OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE 53 AID TO LOCALITIES S. 10262 10 1 EMPLOYMENT AND INCOME SUPPORT PROGRAM ....... [262,533,000] 525,066,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 Local Assistance Account - 10000 5 For state reimbursement of the safety net 6 assistance program as established pursuant 7 to chapter 436 of the laws of 1997. 8 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 9 services law or any other inconsistent 10 provision of law, funds appropriated here- 11 in shall reimburse 29 percent of safety 12 net assistance expenditures, including the 13 cost of providing shelter supplements for 14 safety net assistance households at local 15 option, including eligible households 16 containing a household member who has been 17 released from prison, in order to prevent 18 eviction and address homelessness in 19 accordance with social services district 20 plans approved by the office of temporary 21 and disability assistance and the director 22 of the budget, provided, however, that in 23 social services districts with a popu- 24 lation over five million no shelter 25 supplements other than the family home- 26 lessness and eviction prevention supple- 27 ment shall be reimbursed, provided however 28 funds appropriated herein shall only be 29 used to reimburse rental costs up to the 30 maximum rent levels in place as of January 31 1, 2021, then adjusted consistent with the 32 annual year-over-year percentage changes 33 in fair market rent, provided, however, in 34 the event of a decrease in fair market 35 rent the value of the maximum rent levels 36 reimbursed with funds appropriated herein 37 shall not decrease and shall be set at the 38 maximum rent levels established during the 39 prior year, and further provided that such 40 supplements shall not be part of the stan- 41 dard of need pursuant to section 131-a of 42 the social services law. Funds appropri- 43 ated herein shall also reimburse 29 44 percent of safety net assistance expendi- 45 tures, in social services districts with a 46 population over five million, for emergen- 47 cy shelter, transportation, or nutrition 48 payments which the district determines are 49 necessary to establish or maintain inde- 50 pendent living arrangements among persons 51 living with medically diagnosed HIV 52 infection as defined by the AIDS institute 53 of the state department of health and who 54 are homeless or facing homelessness and S. 10262 11 1 for whom no viable and less costly alter- 2 native to housing is available; provided, 3 however, that funds appropriated herein 4 may only be used for such purposes if the 5 cost of such allowances are not eligible 6 for reimbursement under medical assistance 7 or other programs. 8 Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29 9 percent of safety net assistance expendi- 10 tures, in social services districts with a 11 population of five million or fewer, for 12 emergency shelter payments promulgated by 13 the office of temporary and disability 14 assistance which the district determines 15 are necessary to establish or maintain 16 independent living arrangements among 17 persons living with medically diagnosed 18 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 19 institute of the state department of 20 health and who are homeless or facing 21 homelessness and for whom no viable and 22 less costly alternative to housing is 23 available; provided, however, that funds 24 appropriated herein may only be used for 25 such purposes if the cost of such allow- 26 ances are not eligible for reimbursement 27 under medical assistance or other 28 programs. 29 Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29 30 percent of safety net assistance expendi- 31 tures, in social services districts with a 32 population of five million or fewer, for 33 emergency shelter payments in excess of 34 those promulgated by the office of tempo- 35 rary and disability assistance but not 36 exceeding an amount reasonably approximate 37 to 100 percent of fair market rent, at 38 local option which the district determines 39 are necessary to establish or maintain 40 independent living arrangements among 41 persons living with medically diagnosed 42 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 43 institute of the state department of 44 health and who are homeless or facing 45 homelessness and for whom no viable and 46 less costly alternative to housing is 47 available; provided, however, that funds 48 appropriated herein may only be used for 49 such purposes if the cost of such allow- 50 ances are not eligible for reimbursement 51 under medical assistance or other 52 programs. Such emergency shelter payments 53 shall only be made at local option and in 54 accordance with a plan approved by the 55 office of temporary and disability assist- 56 ance and the director of the budget. S. 10262 12 1 Provided, however, notwithstanding section 2 153 of the social services law or any 3 other inconsistent provision of law, if 4 necessary funding, as determined by the 5 director of the budget, is secured in a 6 social services district from the medical 7 assistance program by reducing the capita- 8 tion rates paid to medicaid managed care 9 organizations by the amount of savings 10 resulting from stably housing individuals 11 living with medically diagnosed HIV 12 infection as defined by the AIDS institute 13 of the state department of health, the 14 social services district shall make such 15 emergency shelter payments in excess of 16 those promulgated by the office of tempo- 17 rary and disability assistance but not 18 exceeding an amount reasonably approximate 19 to 100 percent of fair market rent, and 20 the savings shall be used to reimburse 100 21 percent of the cost of such excess emer- 22 gency shelter payments for cases reim- 23 bursed under the safety net assistance or 24 family assistance programs in social 25 services districts with a population of 26 five million or fewer, in accordance with 27 a plan approved by the office of temporary 28 and disability assistance and the director 29 of the budget; provided further that 30 reimbursement shall be provided to medi- 31 caid managed care organizations through 32 adjustments to capitation rates should 33 actual gross savings not be realized as 34 determined by the director of the budget. 35 For persons living with medically diagnosed 36 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 37 institute of the state department of 38 health living in social services districts 39 with a population over five million who 40 are receiving public assistance, funds 41 appropriated herein shall be used to reim- 42 burse 29 percent of the additional rental 43 costs determined based on limiting such 44 person's earned and/or unearned income 45 contribution to 30 percent. 46 For persons living with medically diagnosed 47 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 48 institute of the state department of 49 health living in social services districts 50 with a population of five million or fewer 51 who are receiving public assistance, funds 52 appropriated herein may be used to reim- 53 burse up to 100 percent of the additional 54 rental costs determined based on limiting 55 such person's earned and/or unearned 56 income contribution to 30 percent. Such S. 10262 13 1 payments of additional rental costs shall 2 only be made at local option and in 3 accordance with a plan approved by the 4 office of temporary and disability assist- 5 ance and the director of the budget. 6 Provided, however, notwithstanding section 7 153 of the social services law or any 8 other inconsistent provision of law, if 9 necessary funding, as determined by the 10 director of the budget, is secured in a 11 social services district from the medical 12 assistance program by reducing the capita- 13 tion rates paid to medicaid managed care 14 organizations by the amount of savings 15 resulting from stably housing individuals 16 living with medically diagnosed HIV 17 infection as defined by the AIDS institute 18 of the state department of health, the 19 social services district shall make such 20 payments of additional rental costs, for 21 cases reimbursed under the safety net 22 assistance and family assistance program, 23 and the savings shall be used to reimburse 24 100 percent of the cost of the additional 25 rental costs determined based on limiting 26 such person's earned and/or unearned 27 income contribution to 30 percent in 28 social services districts with a popu- 29 lation of five million or fewer, in 30 accordance with a plan approved by the 31 office of temporary and disability assist- 32 ance and the director of the budget; 33 provided further that reimbursement shall 34 be provided to medicaid managed care 35 organizations through adjustments to capi- 36 tation rates should actual gross savings 37 not be realized as determined by the 38 director of the budget. 39 Amounts appropriated herein may be used to 40 enter into contracts with persons or enti- 41 ties authorized pursuant to subdivision 42 (j) of section 17 of the social services 43 law consistent with federal law and 44 requirements. Such contracts will be 45 consistent with subdivision (j) of section 46 17 of the social services law. Notwith- 47 standing section 153 of the social 48 services law or any other inconsistent 49 provision of law, the office may reduce 50 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 51 services districts to recover 29 percent 52 of costs incurred by the office for 53 expenditures related to subdivision (j) of 54 section 17 of the social services law. 55 Such funds are to be available for payment 56 of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to S. 10262 14 1 accrue to municipalities. Subject to the 2 approval of the director of the budget, 3 such funds shall be available to the 4 office of temporary and disability assist- 5 ance net of disallowances, refunds, 6 reimbursements, and credits, including 7 those related to title IV-E of the social 8 security act; and including, but not 9 limited to, additional federal funds 10 resulting from any changes in federal cost 11 allocation methodologies. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 14 be increased or decreased by interchange 15 with any other appropriation within the 16 office of temporary and disability assist- 17 ance general fund - local assistance 18 account with the approval of the director 19 of the budget, who shall file such 20 approval with the department of audit and 21 control and copies thereof with the chair- 22 man of the senate finance committee and 23 the chairman of the assembly ways and 24 means committee. 25 Social services districts shall be required 26 to report to the office of temporary and 27 disability assistance on an annual basis, 28 information, as determined and requested 29 by the office, related to services and 30 expenditures for which reimbursement is 31 sought for providing temporary housing 32 assistance to homeless individuals and 33 families. Such information shall be 34 submitted electronically to the extent 35 feasible as determined by the office, and 36 shall be used to evaluate expenditures by 37 such social services districts for the 38 provision of temporary housing assistance 39 for homeless individuals and families. 40 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 41 services law, or any other inconsistent 42 provision of law, the office of temporary 43 and disability assistance may withhold or 44 deny reimbursement, in whole or in part, 45 to any social services district that fails 46 to develop or submit a homeless services 47 plan subject to the approval of the office 48 of temporary and disability assistance, 49 fails to provide homeless services and 50 outreach in accordance with its approved 51 homeless services plan, or fails to devel- 52 op or submit homeless services outcome 53 reports, consistent with those require- 54 ments promulgated by the office of tempo- 55 rary and disability assistance. S. 10262 15 1 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 2 services law, or any other inconsistent 3 provision of law, such appropriation shall 4 be available for reimbursement of eligible 5 costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026 6 and before January 1, 2027, that are 7 otherwise reimbursable by the state on or 8 after April 1, 2026, that are claimed by 9 March 1, 2027. Such reimbursement shall 10 constitute total state reimbursement for 11 activities funded herein in state fiscal 12 year 2026-2027 (52203) ....... [79,200,000] 158,400,000 13 For expenditures for additional state 14 payments for eligible aged, blind, and 15 disabled persons related to supplemental 16 security income and for expenditures made 17 pursuant to title 8 of article 5 of the 18 social services law. Such funds are avail- 19 able for payment of aid heretofore accrued 20 or hereafter to accrue. Notwithstanding 21 any inconsistent provision of law, the 22 amount herein appropriated may be 23 increased or decreased by interchange with 24 any other appropriation within the office 25 of temporary and disability assistance 26 general fund - local assistance account 27 with the approval of the director of the 28 budget, who shall file such approval with 29 the department of audit and control and 30 copies thereof with the chairman of the 31 senate finance committee and the chairman 32 of the assembly ways and means committee 33 (52311) ...................... [58,333,000] 116,666,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 37 Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Account - 25178 38 For reimbursement of the cost of the family 39 assistance and the emergency assistance to 40 families programs. Notwithstanding section 41 153 of the social services law or any 42 inconsistent provision of law, funds 43 appropriated herein shall be provided 44 without state or local participation 45 except that for social services districts 46 with a population of five million or more, 47 reimbursement will be eighty-five percent. 48 Funds appropriated herein shall also 49 include the cost of providing shelter 50 supplements for family assistance house- 51 holds at local option, including eligible 52 households containing a household member 53 who has been released from prison, in 54 order to prevent eviction and address S. 10262 16 1 homelessness in accordance with social 2 services district plans approved by the 3 office of temporary and disability assist- 4 ance and the director of the budget, 5 provided, however, that in social services 6 districts with a population over five 7 million no shelter supplements other than 8 the family homelessness and eviction 9 prevention supplement shall be reimbursed, 10 provided however funds appropriated herein 11 shall only be used to reimburse rental 12 costs up to the maximum rent levels in 13 place as of January 1, 2021, then adjusted 14 consistent with the annual year-over-year 15 percentage changes in fair market rent, 16 provided, however, in the event of a 17 decrease in fair market rent the value of 18 the maximum rent levels reimbursed with 19 funds appropriated herein shall not 20 decrease and shall be set at the maximum 21 rent levels established during the prior 22 year, and further provided that such 23 supplements shall not be part of the stan- 24 dard of need pursuant to section 131-a of 25 the social services law. 26 Funds appropriated herein shall also reim- 27 burse for family assistance expenditures 28 for emergency shelter, transportation, or 29 nutrition payments which the district 30 determines are necessary to establish or 31 maintain independent living arrangements 32 among persons living with medically diag- 33 nosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 34 institute of the state department of 35 health and who are homeless or facing 36 homelessness and for whom no viable and 37 less costly alternative to housing is 38 available; provided, however, that funds 39 appropriated herein may only be used for 40 such purposes if the cost of such allow- 41 ances are not eligible for reimbursement 42 under medical assistance or other 43 programs. 44 For persons living with medically diagnosed 45 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 46 institute of the state department of 47 health who are receiving public assistance 48 funds appropriated herein shall not be 49 used to reimburse the additional rental 50 costs determined based on limiting such 51 person's earned and/or unearned income 52 contribution to 30 percent. 53 Amounts appropriated herein may be used to 54 enter into contracts with persons or enti- 55 ties authorized pursuant to subdivision 56 (j) of section 17 of the social services S. 10262 17 1 law consistent with federal law and 2 requirements. Such contracts will be made 3 consistent with subdivision (j) of section 4 17 of the social services law. Notwith- 5 standing section 153 of the social 6 services law or any other inconsistent 7 provision of law, the office may reduce 8 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 9 services districts to recover the federal 10 share of costs incurred by the office for 11 expenditures related to subdivision (j) of 12 section 17 of the social services law. 13 Such funds are to be available for payment 14 of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to 15 accrue to municipalities. Subject to the 16 approval of the director of the budget, 17 such funds shall be available to the 18 office of temporary and disability assist- 19 ance net of disallowances, refunds, 20 reimbursements, and credits including, but 21 not limited to, additional federal funds 22 resulting from any changes in federal cost 23 allocation methodologies. 24 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 25 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 26 be increased or decreased by interchange 27 with any other appropriation within the 28 office of temporary and disability assist- 29 ance federal fund - local assistance 30 account with the approval of the director 31 of the budget, who shall file such 32 approval with the department of audit and 33 control and copies thereof with the chair- 34 man of the senate finance committee and 35 the chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. 37 Social services districts shall be required 38 to report to the office of temporary and 39 disability assistance on an annual basis, 40 information, as determined and requested 41 by the office, related to services and 42 expenditures for which reimbursement is 43 sought for providing temporary housing 44 assistance to homeless individuals and 45 families. Such information shall be 46 submitted electronically to the extent 47 feasible as determined by the office, and 48 shall be used to evaluate expenditures by 49 such social services districts for the 50 provision of temporary housing assistance 51 for homeless individuals and families. 52 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 53 services law, or any other inconsistent 54 provision of law, the office of temporary 55 and disability assistance may withhold or 56 deny reimbursement, in whole or in part, S. 10262 18 1 to any social services district that fails 2 to develop or submit a homeless services 3 plan subject to the approval of the office 4 of temporary and disability assistance, 5 fails to provide homeless services and 6 outreach in accordance with its approved 7 homeless services plan, or fails to devel- 8 op or submit homeless services outcome 9 reports, consistent with those require- 10 ments promulgated by the office of tempo- 11 rary and disability assistance. 12 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 13 services law, or any other inconsistent 14 provision of law, such appropriation shall 15 be available for reimbursement of eligible 16 costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026 17 and before January 1, 2027, that are 18 otherwise reimbursable by the state on or 19 after April 1, 2026, that are claimed by 20 March 1, 2027. Such reimbursement shall 21 constitute total federal reimbursement for 22 activities funded herein in state fiscal 23 year 2026-27 (52203) ........ [125,000,000] 250,000,000 24 -------------- 25 § 10. Section 5 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 26 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 27 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 29 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 30 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 31 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 32 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 33 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 34 AID TO LOCALITIES 35 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM .......... [53,932,000] 57,142,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 Local Assistance Account - 10000 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 Indian health program pursuant to a plan 41 prepared by the commissioner of health and 42 approved by the director of the budget. 43 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 44 for payment of financial assistance here- 45 tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue 46 (26840) ..................................... 10,062,000 47 -------------- 48 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 49 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund S. 10262 19 1 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 2 For various federal food and nutritional 3 services. The moneys hereby appropriated 4 shall be available for payment of finan- 5 cial assistance heretofore accrued (26986) 6 .............................. [43,870,000] 47,080,000 7 -------------- 8 CHILD HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ............................. 212,950,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 HCRA Resources Fund 12 Children's Health Insurance Account - 20810 13 The money hereby appropriated is available 14 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 15 hereafter accrued. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 17 the money hereby appropriated may be 18 increased or decreased by transfer or 19 suballocation to appropriations of the 20 office of temporary and disability assist- 21 ance, for the reimbursement of local 22 district administrative costs related to 23 children newly enrolled in medicaid whose 24 household income is between 100 percent 25 and 133 percent of the federal poverty 26 level. 27 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 28 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 29 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 30 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 31 and/or disallowances. 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 children's health insurance program 34 authorized pursuant to title 1-A of arti- 35 cle 25 of the public health law (26931) .... 212,950,000 36 -------------- 37 ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM ............ 1,800,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 HCRA Resources Fund 41 EPIC Premium Account - 20818 42 For services and expenses of the program for 43 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage, 44 including reimbursement to pharmacies 45 participating in such program. The moneys 46 hereby appropriated shall be available for 47 payment of financial assistance heretofore 48 accrued (26803) .............................. 1,800,000 49 -------------- S. 10262 20 1 ESSENTIAL PLAN PROGRAM ................................... 1,150,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 5 Essential Plan Account - 25186 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 essential plan program, in accordance 8 State Innovation Waiver provisions author- 9 ized by Section 1332 of the federal 10 patient protection and affordable care 11 act. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 14 be increased or decreased by interchange 15 or transfer with any appropriation of the 16 department of health or for transfer to 17 Health Research Incorporated (HRI). 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 20 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 21 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 22 and/or disallowances. 23 The money hereby appropriated is available 24 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 25 hereafter accrued (59054) ................ 1,150,000,000 26 -------------- 27 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ............. [10,409,681,000] 12,369,631,000 28 -------------- 29 General Fund 30 Local Assistance Account - 10000 31 For the medical assistance program, includ- 32 ing administrative expenses, for local 33 social services districts, and for medical 34 care rates for authorized child care agen- 35 cies. 36 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 37 finance law or any provision of law to the 38 contrary, subject to federal approval, 39 department of health state funds medicaid 40 spending, excluding payments for medical 41 services provided at state facilities 42 operated by the office of mental health, 43 the office for people with developmental 44 disabilities and the office of addiction 45 services and supports and further exclud- 46 ing any payments which are not appropri- 47 ated within the department of health, in 48 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 49 2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not 50 exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided 51 below provided, however, such aggregate S. 10262 21 1 limits may be adjusted by the director of 2 the budget to account for any changes in 3 the New York state federal medical assist- 4 ance percentage amount established pursu- 5 ant to the federal social security act, 6 increases in provider revenues, reductions 7 in local social services district payments 8 for medical assistance administration, 9 minimum wage increases, and beginning 10 April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the 11 New York state medical indemnity fund, 12 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 13 2011, and state costs or savings from the 14 essential plan program. Such projections 15 may be adjusted by the director of the 16 budget to account for increased or expe- 17 dited department of health state funds 18 medicaid expenditures as a result of a 19 natural or other type of disaster, includ- 20 ing a governmental declaration of emergen- 21 cy. 22 The director of the budget, in consultation 23 with the commissioner of health, shall 24 assess on a quarterly basis known and 25 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 26 ry of service and by geographic region, as 27 defined by the commissioner, incurred both 28 prior to and subsequent to such assessment 29 for each such period, and if the director 30 of the budget determines that such expend- 31 itures are expected to cause medicaid 32 spending for such period to exceed the 33 aggregate limit specified herein for such 34 period, the state medicaid director, in 35 consultation with the director of the 36 budget and the commissioner of health, 37 shall develop a medicaid savings allo- 38 cation adjustment to limit such spending 39 to the aggregate limit specified herein 40 for such period. 41 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 42 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 43 tures authorized by the appropriations 44 herein in compliance with the following 45 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 46 in compliance with applicable federal law, 47 including the provisions of the Patient 48 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 49 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 50 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 51 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 52 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent 53 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 54 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 55 made in a manner that complies with the 56 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- S. 10262 22 1 al centers for medicare and medicaid 2 services, provided, however, that the 3 commissioner of health is authorized to 4 submit any state plan amendment or seek 5 other federal approval, including waiver 6 authority, to implement the provisions of 7 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 8 that meets the other criteria set forth 9 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 10 manner that maximizes federal financial 11 participation, to the extent practicable, 12 including any federal financial partic- 13 ipation that is available or is reasonably 14 expected to become available, in the 15 discretion of the commissioner, under the 16 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 17 be made uniformly among categories of 18 services and geographic regions of the 19 state, to the extent practicable, and 20 shall be made uniformly within a category 21 of service, to the extent practicable, 22 except where the commissioner determines 23 that there are sufficient grounds for 24 non-uniformity, including but not limited 25 to: the extent to which specific catego- 26 ries of services contributed to department 27 of health medicaid state funds spending in 28 excess of the limits specified herein; the 29 need to maintain safety net services in 30 underserved communities; or the potential 31 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 32 models contemplated by the Affordable Care 33 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 34 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 35 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 36 shall be made in a manner that does not 37 unnecessarily create administrative 38 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 39 ents or providers. 40 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 41 legislature, as well as organizations 42 representing health care providers, 43 consumers, businesses, workers, health 44 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 45 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 46 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 47 all or part of such adjustment, in the 48 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 49 to have a material impact on the overall 50 medicaid program, particular categories of 51 service or particular geographic regions 52 of the state. 53 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 54 savings allocation adjustment on the 55 department of health's website and shall 56 provide written copies of such adjustment S. 10262 23 1 to the chairs of the senate finance and 2 the assembly ways and means committees at 3 least 30 days before the date on which 4 implementation is expected to begin. 5 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 6 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 7 to the provisions of notice and prior to 8 implementation but needs to provide a new 9 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 10 this paragraph only if the commissioner 11 determines, in his or her discretion, that 12 such revisions materially alter the 13 adjustment. 14 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 15 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 16 commissioner need not seek the input 17 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 18 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 19 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 20 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 21 development and implementation of a medi- 22 caid savings allocation adjustment is 23 necessary due to a public health emergen- 24 cy. 25 For purposes of this section, a public 26 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 27 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 28 significantly increases the immediate need 29 for health care personnel in an area of 30 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 31 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 32 serious communicable disease, or the 33 potential for such widespread risk of 34 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 35 condition determined by the commissioner 36 to constitute an imminent threat to public 37 health. 38 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 39 prevent all or part of such medicaid 40 savings allocation adjustment from taking 41 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 42 ted by the federal centers for medicare 43 and medicaid services. 44 In accordance with the medicaid savings 45 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 46 the department of health shall reduce 47 department of health state funds medicaid 48 spending by the amount of the projected 49 overspending through, actions including, 50 but not limited to modifying or suspending 51 reimbursement methods, including but not 52 limited to all fees, premium levels and 53 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 54 provision of law that sets a specific 55 amount or methodology for any such 56 payments or rates of payment; modifying or S. 10262 24 1 discontinuing medicaid program benefits; 2 seeking all necessary federal approvals, 3 including, but not limited to waivers, 4 waiver amendments; and suspending time 5 frames for notice, approval or certif- 6 ication of rate requirements, notwith- 7 standing any provision of law, rule or 8 regulation to the contrary, including but 9 not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of 10 the public health law, section 18 of chap- 11 ter 2 of the laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 12 505.14(h). 13 The department of health shall prepare a 14 quarterly report that sets forth: (a) 15 known and projected department of health 16 medicaid expenditures as described in 17 subdivision (1) of this section, and 18 factors that could result in medicaid 19 disbursements for the relevant state 20 fiscal year to exceed the projected 21 department of health state funds disburse- 22 ments in the enacted budget financial plan 23 pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of 24 the state finance law, including spending 25 increases or decreases due to: enrollment 26 fluctuations, rate changes, utilization 27 changes, MRT investments, and shift of 28 beneficiaries to managed care; and vari- 29 ations in offline medicaid payments; and 30 (b) the actions taken to implement any 31 medicaid savings allocation adjustment 32 implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of 33 this section, including information 34 concerning the impact of such actions on 35 each category of service and each 36 geographic region of the state. Each such 37 quarterly report shall be provided to the 38 chairs of the senate finance and the 39 assembly ways and means committees and 40 shall be posted on the department of 41 health's website in a timely manner. 42 The money hereby appropriated is to be 43 available for payment of aid heretofore 44 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 45 palities, and to providers of medical 46 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 47 social services law, and for payment of 48 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 49 ers of family care where payment systems 50 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 51 operational. 52 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 53 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 54 by the department for outside legal 55 assistance on issues involving the federal 56 government, the conduct of preadmission S. 10262 25 1 screening and annual resident reviews 2 required by the state's medicaid program, 3 computer matching with insurance carriers 4 to insure that medicaid is the payer of 5 last resort and activities related to the 6 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 7 able under the medicaid program. 8 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 9 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 10 the social services law, or payments of 11 federal funds otherwise due to the local 12 social services districts for programs 13 provided under the federal social security 14 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 15 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 16 by the state commissioner of temporary and 17 disability assistance or the state commis- 18 sioner of health as due from local social 19 services districts each month as their 20 share of payments made pursuant to section 21 367-b of the social services law may be 22 set aside by the state comptroller in an 23 interest-bearing account in order to 24 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 25 providers under section 367-b of the 26 social services law pursuant to an esti- 27 mate provided by the commissioner of 28 health of each local social services 29 district's share of payments made pursuant 30 to section 367-b of the social services 31 law. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law, funding made available by these 34 appropriations shall support direct salary 35 costs and related fringe benefits within 36 the medical assistance program associated 37 with any minimum wage increase that takes 38 effect during the timeframe of these 39 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 40 the labor law. Each eligible organization 41 in receipt of funding made available by 42 these appropriations may be required to 43 submit written certification, in such form 44 and at such time the commissioner may 45 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 46 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 47 tion, how such funding will be or was used 48 for purposes eligible under these appro- 49 priations and any other reporting deemed 50 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 51 appropriated herein may include advances 52 to organizations authorized to receive 53 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 54 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 55 the money hereby appropriated may be 56 increased or decreased by interchange or S. 10262 26 1 transfer, with any appropriation of the 2 department of health and the office of 3 medicaid inspector general and may be 4 increased or decreased by transfer or 5 suballocation between these appropriated 6 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 7 ment of health state purpose account, the 8 office of mental health, office for people 9 with developmental disabilities, the 10 office of addiction services and supports, 11 the department of family assistance office 12 of temporary and disability assistance, 13 the department of corrections and communi- 14 ty supervision, the office of information 15 technology services, the state university 16 of New York, and office of children and 17 family services, the office of medicaid 18 inspector general, the state education 19 department, and the state office for the 20 aging with the approval of the director of 21 the budget, who shall file such approval 22 with the department of audit and control 23 and copies thereof with the chairman of 24 the senate finance committee and the 25 chairman of the assembly ways and means 26 committee. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 28 of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby 29 appropriated may be used for payments to 30 the centers for medicaid and medicare 31 services for obligations incurred related 32 to the pharmaceutical costs of dually 33 eligible medicare/medicaid beneficiaries 34 participating in the medicare drug benefit 35 authorized by P.L. 108-173. 36 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 37 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated 38 shall not be used for any existing rates, 39 fees, fee schedule, or procedures which 40 may affect the cost of care and services 41 provided by personal care providers, case 42 managers, health maintenance organiza- 43 tions, out of state medical facilities 44 which provide care and services to resi- 45 dents of the state, providers of transpor- 46 tation services, that are altered, 47 amended, adjusted or otherwise changed by 48 a local social services district unless 49 previously approved by the department of 50 health and the director of the budget. 51 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 52 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 53 made available to the commissioner of the 54 office of mental health or the commission- 55 er of the office of addiction services and 56 supports, in consultation with the commis- S. 10262 27 1 sioner of health and approved by the 2 director of the budget, and consistent 3 with appropriations made therefor, to 4 implement allocation adjustment developed 5 by each such commissioner which shall 6 describe mental health or substance use 7 disorder services that should be developed 8 to meet service needs resulting from the 9 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 10 services provided under the medicaid 11 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 12 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 13 law. Such programs may include programs 14 that are licensed pursuant to both article 15 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 16 28 of the public health law, or certified 17 under both article 32 of the mental 18 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 19 health law. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 21 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 22 be available for payments associated with 23 the resolution by settlement agreement or 24 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 25 where the department of health is a party. 26 For services and expenses of the medical 27 assistance program including hospital 28 inpatient services and general hospitals 29 that are safety-net providers that evince 30 severe financial distress, pursuant to 31 criteria determined by the commissioner, 32 shall be eligible for awards for amounts 33 appropriated herein, to enable such 34 providers to maintain operations and vital 35 services while establishing long term 36 solutions to achieve sustainable health 37 services. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 39 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 40 the medical assistance program for any 41 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 42 without the approval of the director of 43 the budget. 44 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 45 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 46 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 47 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 48 reappropriation for this item covering 49 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 50 ation for this item covering fiscal year 51 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 52 laws of 2025 (26947) ........ [145,428,000] 169,666,000 53 For services and expenses of the medical 54 assistance program including hospital 55 outpatient and emergency room services. S. 10262 28 1 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 2 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 3 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 4 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 5 reappropriation for this item covering 6 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 7 ation for this item covering fiscal year 8 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 9 laws of 2025 (26948) ......... [43,494,000] 50,743,000 10 For services and expenses of the medical 11 assistance program including clinic 12 services. 13 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 14 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 15 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 16 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 17 reappropriation for this item covering 18 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 19 ation for this item covering fiscal year 20 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 21 laws of 2025 (26949) ......... [85,188,000] 99,386,000 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including nursing home 24 services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26950) ........ [214,110,000] 249,795,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including other long 36 term care services. 37 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 38 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 39 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 40 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 41 reappropriation for this item covering 42 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 43 ation for this item covering fiscal year 44 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 45 laws of 2025 (26951) ..................... 46 .......................... [1,019,916,000] 1,189,902,000 47 For services and expenses of the medical 48 assistance program including managed care 49 services including regional planning 50 activities of the finger lakes health 51 systems agency, including statewide coor- 52 dination and demonstration of best prac- 53 tices. The department shall make grants 54 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 55 assure high-quality and accessible primary 56 care, to provide technical assistance to S. 10262 29 1 support financial and business planning 2 for integrated systems of care, and to 3 assist primary care providers in the 4 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 5 use of electronic health record technolo- 6 gy. 7 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 8 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 9 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 10 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 11 reappropriation for this item covering 12 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 13 ation for this item covering fiscal year 14 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 15 laws of 2025 (26952) ....... [934,260,000] 1,089,970,000 16 For services and expenses for health homes 17 including grants to health homes. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 20 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 21 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 22 reappropriation for this item covering 23 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 24 ation for this item covering fiscal year 25 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 26 laws of 2025 (29548) ......... [22,620,000] 26,390,000 27 For services and expenses of the medical 28 assistance program including pharmacy 29 services provided, however, that no funds 30 shall be made available pursuant to this 31 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 32 authorized in any enacted law, rule, or 33 regulation without approval from the 34 director of the budget. 35 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 36 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 37 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 38 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 39 reappropriation for this item covering 40 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 41 ation for this item covering fiscal year 42 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 43 laws of 2025 (26953) ........ [431,556,000] 503,482,000 44 For services and expenses of the medical 45 assistance program including transporta- 46 tion services. 47 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 48 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 49 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 50 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 51 reappropriation for this item covering 52 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 53 ation for this item covering fiscal year 54 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 55 laws of 2025 (26954) ......... [61,992,000] 72,324,000 S. 10262 30 1 For services and expenses of the medical 2 assistance program including dental 3 services. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 5 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 6 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 7 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 8 reappropriation for this item covering 9 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 10 ation for this item covering fiscal year 11 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 12 laws of 2025 (26955) ............ [474,000] 553,000 13 For services and expenses of the medical 14 assistance program including non-institu- 15 tional and other spending. 16 The money hereby appropriated is available 17 for payment of liabilities heretofore 18 accrued or hereafter accrued. 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 20 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 21 be available for payments to any county or 22 public school districts associated with 23 additional claims for school supportive 24 health services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26956) ........ [123,624,000] 144,228,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including medical 36 services provided at state facilities 37 operated by the office of mental health, 38 the office for people with developmental 39 disabilities and the office of addiction 40 services and supports. 41 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 42 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 43 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 44 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 45 reappropriation for this item covering 46 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 47 ation for this item covering fiscal year 48 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 49 laws of 2025 (26961) ........ [576,924,000] 673,078,000 50 -------------- 51 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 52 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 53 Medicaid Direct Account - 25106 S. 10262 31 1 For services and expenses for the medical 2 assistance program, including administra- 3 tive expenses for local social services 4 districts, pursuant to title XIX of the 5 federal social security act or its succes- 6 sor program. 7 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 8 available for payment of aid heretofore 9 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 10 palities, and to providers of medical 11 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 12 social services law, and for payment of 13 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 14 ers of family care where payment systems 15 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 16 operational. 17 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 18 of law, funding made available by these 19 appropriations shall support direct salary 20 costs and related fringe benefits within 21 the medical assistance program associated 22 with any minimum wage increase that takes 23 effect during the timeframe of these 24 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 25 the labor law. Each eligible organization 26 in receipt of funding made available by 27 these appropriations may be required to 28 submit written certification, in such form 29 and at such time the commissioner may 30 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 31 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 32 tion, how such funding will be or was used 33 for purposes eligible under these appro- 34 priations and any other reporting deemed 35 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 36 appropriated herein may include advances 37 to organizations authorized to receive 38 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 40 the money hereby appropriated may be 41 increased or decreased by interchange or 42 transfer, with any appropriation of the 43 department of health and the office of 44 medicaid inspector general and may be 45 increased or decreased by transfer or 46 suballocation between these appropriated 47 amounts and appropriations of the office 48 of mental health, office for people with 49 developmental disabilities, the office of 50 addiction services and supports, the 51 department of family assistance office of 52 temporary and disability assistance, 53 office of children and family services, 54 the department of financial services, 55 department of corrections and community 56 supervision, the office of information S. 10262 32 1 technology services, the state university 2 of New York, the state education depart- 3 ment, and the state office for the aging 4 with the approval of the director of the 5 budget, who shall file such approval with 6 the department of audit and control and 7 copies thereof with the chairman of the 8 senate finance committee and the chairman 9 of the assembly ways and means committee. 10 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 11 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 12 the social services law, or payments of 13 federal funds otherwise due to the local 14 social services districts for programs 15 provided under the federal social security 16 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 17 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 18 by the state commissioner of temporary and 19 disability assistance or the state commis- 20 sioner of health as due from local social 21 services districts each month as their 22 share of payments made pursuant to section 23 367-b of the social services law may be 24 set aside by the state comptroller in an 25 interest-bearing account in order to 26 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 27 providers under section 367-b of the 28 social services law pursuant to an esti- 29 mate provided by the commissioner of 30 health of each local social services 31 district's share of payments made pursuant 32 to section 367-b of the social services 33 law. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 36 made available to the commissioner of the 37 office of mental health or the commission- 38 er of the office of addiction services and 39 supports, in consultation with the commis- 40 sioner of health and approved by the 41 director of the budget, and consistent 42 with appropriations made therefor, to 43 implement allocation adjustment developed 44 by each such commissioner which shall 45 describe mental health or substance use 46 disorder services that should be developed 47 to meet service needs resulting from the 48 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 49 services provided under the medicaid 50 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 51 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 52 law. Such programs may include programs 53 that are licensed pursuant to both article 54 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 55 28 of the public health law, or certified 56 under both article 32 of the mental S. 10262 33 1 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 2 health law. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 5 be available for payments associated with 6 the resolution by settlement agreement or 7 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 8 where the department of health is a party. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 10 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 11 the medical assistance program for any 12 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 13 without the approval of the director of 14 the budget. 15 For services and expenses of the medical 16 assistance program including hospital 17 inpatient services. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 20 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 21 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 22 reappropriation for this item covering 23 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 24 ation for this item covering fiscal year 25 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 26 laws of 2025 (26947) ........ [379,425,000] 455,310,000 27 For services and expenses of the medical 28 assistance program including hospital 29 outpatient and emergency room services. 30 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 31 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 32 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 33 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 34 reappropriation for this item covering 35 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 36 ation for this item covering fiscal year 37 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 38 laws of 2025 (26948) ......... [67,620,000] 81,144,000 39 For services and expenses of the medical 40 assistance program including clinic 41 services. 42 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 43 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 44 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 45 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 46 reappropriation for this item covering 47 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 48 ation for this item covering fiscal year 49 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 50 laws of 2025 (26949) ........ [109,485,000] 131,382,000 51 For services and expenses of the medical 52 assistance program including nursing home 53 services. 54 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 55 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 56 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall S. 10262 34 1 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 2 reappropriation for this item covering 3 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 4 ation for this item covering fiscal year 5 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 6 laws of 2025 (26950) ........ [563,700,000] 676,440,000 7 For services and expenses of the medical 8 assistance program including other long 9 term care services. 10 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 11 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 12 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 13 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 14 reappropriation for this item covering 15 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 16 ation for this item covering fiscal year 17 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 18 laws of 2025 (26951) ..... [1,608,045,000] 1,929,654,000 19 For services and expenses of the medical 20 assistance program including managed care 21 services including regional planning 22 activities of the finger lakes health 23 systems agency, including statewide coor- 24 dination and demonstration of best prac- 25 tices. The department shall make grants 26 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 27 assure high-quality and accessible primary 28 care, to provide technical assistance to 29 support financial and business planning 30 for integrated systems of care, and to 31 assist primary care providers in the 32 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 33 use of electronic health record technolo- 34 gy. 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 36 of law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 37 ry, funds appropriated herein shall not be 38 subject to article 6 of the financial 39 services law. 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 41 of law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 42 ry, funds appropriated herein shall only 43 be made available for applied behavior 44 analysis services if such services are 45 recommended by a health care or mental 46 health care practitioner authorized under 47 title eight of the education law who has 48 been designated as an applied behavior 49 analysis center of excellence provider by 50 the commissioner of health. 51 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 52 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 53 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 54 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 55 reappropriation for this item covering S. 10262 35 1 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 2 ation for this item covering fiscal year 3 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 4 laws of 2025 (26952) ..... [1,962,340,000] 2,354,808,000 5 For services and expenses of the medical 6 assistance program including pharmacy 7 services, provided, however, that no funds 8 shall be made available pursuant to this 9 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 10 authorized in any heretofore enacted law, 11 rule, or regulation without approval from 12 the director of the budget. 13 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 14 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 15 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 16 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 17 reappropriation for this item covering 18 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 19 ation for this item covering fiscal year 20 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 21 laws of 2025 (26953) ........ [591,095,000] 709,314,000 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including transporta- 24 tion services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26954) ......... [79,410,000] 95,292,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including dental 36 services. 37 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 38 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 39 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 40 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 41 reappropriation for this item covering 42 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 43 ation for this item covering fiscal year 44 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 45 laws of 2025 (26955) .......... [9,180,000] 11,016,000 46 For services and expenses of the medical 47 assistance program including noninstitu- 48 tional and other spending. 49 The money hereby appropriated is available 50 for payment of liabilities heretofore 51 accrued or hereafter accrued. 52 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 53 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 54 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 55 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 56 reappropriation for this item covering S. 10262 36 1 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 2 ation for this item covering fiscal year 3 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 4 laws of 2025 (26956) ....... [899,025,000] 1,078,830,000 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 6 of law, subject to the approval of the 7 director of the budget, upon submission of 8 an allocation adjustment from the commis- 9 sioner of health, the amount appropriated 10 herein, together with any available feder- 11 al matching funds, may be transferred or 12 suballocated to the office of mental 13 health, office of addiction services and 14 supports, office for people with develop- 15 mental disabilities, division of housing 16 and community renewal, New York state 17 housing trust fund corporation, and office 18 of temporary and disability assistance for 19 services and expenses related to providing 20 affordable housing. Any such spending 21 shall consider the geographical location 22 of the grants. 23 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 24 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 25 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 26 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 27 reappropriation for this item covering 28 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 29 ation for this item covering fiscal year 30 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 31 laws of 2025 (29521) ........ [480,770,000] 576,924,000 32 -------------- 33 § 11. Section 6 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 34 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 35 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 6. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 37 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 38 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 39 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 40 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 41 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 42 AID TO LOCALITIES 43 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ... [1,260,000,000] 1,455,000,000 44 -------------- 45 Enterprise Funds 46 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund 47 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650 48 For payment of unemployment insurance bene- 49 fits pursuant to article 18 of the labor 50 law or as authorized by the federal S. 10262 37 1 government through the disaster unemploy- 2 ment assistance program, the emergency 3 unemployment compensation program, the 4 extended benefit program, the federal 5 additional compensation program or any 6 other federally funded unemployment bene- 7 fit program (34787) ...... [1,260,000,000] 1,455,000,000 8 -------------- 9 § 12. Section 7 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 10 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 11 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 7. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 13 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 14 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 15 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 16 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 17 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE 18 OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES 19 AID TO LOCALITIES 20 COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM .................. [769,023,000] 914,076,000 21 -------------- 22 General Fund 23 Local Assistance Account - 10000 24 For services and expenses of the community 25 services program, net of disallowances, 26 for community programs for people with 27 developmental disabilities pursuant to 28 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 29 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 30 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 31 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 32 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 33 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and 34 other provisions of the mental hygiene 35 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 36 provision of law, the following appropri- 37 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 38 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 39 credits. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 41 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 42 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 43 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 44 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 45 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 46 and approved by the director of the budg- 47 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 48 available to reimburse or advance locali- 49 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for S. 10262 38 1 expenditures made during local fiscal 2 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 3 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 4 for the 3 month period beginning January 5 1, 2027. 6 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 7 of the mental hygiene law or any other 8 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 9 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 10 such contract and in the manner provided 11 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 12 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 13 cies arising out of loans which are funded 14 from the proceeds of bonds and notes 15 issued by the dormitory authority of the 16 state of New York. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 18 the money hereby appropriated may be 19 transferred to state operations and/or any 20 appropriation of the office for people 21 with developmental disabilities with the 22 approval of the director of the budget. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 24 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 25 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 26 of the net deficit costs of day training 27 programs and family support services. 28 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 29 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 30 other inconsistent provision of law, with 31 relation to the operation of certified 32 family care homes, including family care 33 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 34 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 35 ation may be used for payments to purchase 36 general services including but not limited 37 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 38 14 days, at rates to be established by the 39 commissioner and approved by the director 40 of the budget in consideration of factors 41 including, but not limited to, geographic 42 area and number of clients cared for in 43 the home and for payment in an amount 44 determined by the commissioner for the 45 personal needs of each client residing in 46 the family care home. 47 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 48 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 49 law and any other inconsistent provision 50 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 51 be used for expenses of family care homes 52 including payments to operators of certi- 53 fied family care homes for damages caused 54 by clients to personal and real property 55 in accordance with standards established S. 10262 39 1 by the commissioner and approved by the 2 director of the budget. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 5 be used for appropriate day program 6 services and residential services includ- 7 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 8 subsidies to individuals, start-up 9 expenses for family care providers, envi- 10 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 11 ogies, appraisals, property options, 12 feasibility studies and preoperational 13 expenses. 14 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 15 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the 16 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 17 targeted inflationary increase, for the 18 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 19 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 20 shall not apply any other inflationary 21 increases, cost of living type increases, 22 inflation factors, or trend factors for 23 the purpose of establishing rates of 24 payments, contracts or any other form of 25 reimbursement; provided that this shall 26 not prevent the commissioner from applying 27 prior adjustments for the purpose of 28 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 29 ing of base year costs. 30 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 31 tion law and any other provision of law, 32 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 33 support staff in programs certified or 34 approved by the office for people with 35 developmental disabilities, including the 36 home and community based services waiver 37 programs that the office for people with 38 developmental disabilities is authorized 39 to administer with federal approval pursu- 40 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 41 the federal social security act, are 42 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 43 may specify when performed under the 44 supervision, training and periodic 45 inspection of a registered professional 46 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 47 practitioner's ordered care. 48 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 49 to the contrary, and consistent with 50 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 51 the directors of facilities licensed but 52 not operated by the office for people with 53 developmental disabilities who act as 54 federally-appointed representative payees 55 and who assume management responsibility 56 over the funds of a resident may continue S. 10262 40 1 to use such funds for the cost of the 2 resident's care and treatment, consistent 3 with federal law and regulations. 4 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 5 in accordance with the following: 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 7 of law, the director of the budget is 8 authorized to make suballocations from 9 this appropriation to the department of 10 health medical assistance program. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 12 of law, and pursuant to criteria estab- 13 lished by the commissioner of the office 14 for people with developmental disabilities 15 and approved by the director of the budg- 16 et, expenditures may be made from this 17 appropriation for residential facilities 18 which are pending recertification as 19 intermediate care facilities for people 20 with developmental disabilities. 21 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 22 41.36 of the mental hygiene law and any 23 other inconsistent provision of law, 24 moneys from this appropriation may be used 25 for payment up to $250 per year per 26 client, at such times and in such manner 27 as determined by the commissioner on the 28 basis of financial need for the personal 29 needs of each client residing in voluntar- 30 y-operated community residences and volun- 31 tary-operated community residential alter- 32 natives, including individualized 33 residential alternatives under the home 34 and community based services waiver. The 35 commissioner shall, subject to the 36 approval of the director of the budget, 37 alter existing advance payment schedules 38 for voluntary-operated community resi- 39 dences established pursuant to section 40 41.36 of the mental hygiene law. 41 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 42 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 43 be used for the operation of clinics 44 licensed pursuant to article 16 of the 45 mental hygiene law including, but not 46 limited to, supportive and habilitative 47 services consistent with the home and 48 community based services waiver. 49 For the state and/or local share of medical 50 assistance services expenses incurred by 51 the department of health for the provision 52 of medical assistance services to people 53 with developmental disabilities (37835) .. 54 ............................. [700,020,000] 840,024,000 55 For services and expenses of the community 56 services program, net of disallowances, S. 10262 41 1 for community programs for people with 2 developmental disabilities pursuant to 3 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 4 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 5 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 6 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 7 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 8 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and 9 other provisions of the mental hygiene 10 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 11 provision of law, the following appropri- 12 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 13 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 14 credits. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 16 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 17 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 18 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 19 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 20 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 21 and approved by the director of the budg- 22 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 23 available to reimburse or advance locali- 24 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for 25 expenditures made during local fiscal 26 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 27 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 28 for the 3 month period beginning January 29 1, 2027. 30 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 31 of the mental hygiene law or any other 32 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 33 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 34 such contract and in the manner provided 35 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 36 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 37 cies arising out of loans which are funded 38 from the proceeds of bonds and notes 39 issued by the dormitory authority of the 40 state of New York. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 42 the money hereby appropriated may be 43 transferred to state operations and/or any 44 appropriation of the office for people 45 with developmental disabilities with the 46 approval of the director of the budget. 47 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 48 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 49 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 50 of the net deficit costs of day training 51 programs and family support services. 52 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 53 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 54 other inconsistent provision of law, with 55 relation to the operation of certified 56 family care homes, including family care S. 10262 42 1 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 2 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 3 ation may be used for payments to purchase 4 general services including but not limited 5 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 6 14 days, at rates to be established by the 7 commissioner and approved by the director 8 of the budget in consideration of factors 9 including, but not limited to, geographic 10 area and number of clients cared for in 11 the home and for payment in an amount 12 determined by the commissioner for the 13 personal needs of each client residing in 14 the family care home. 15 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 16 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 17 law and any other inconsistent provision 18 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 19 be used for expenses of family care homes 20 including payments to operators of certi- 21 fied family care homes for damages caused 22 by clients to personal and real property 23 in accordance with standards established 24 by the commissioner and approved by the 25 director of the budget. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 27 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 28 be used for appropriate day program 29 services and residential services includ- 30 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 31 subsidies to individuals, start-up 32 expenses for family care providers, envi- 33 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 34 ogies, appraisals, property options, 35 feasibility studies and preoperational 36 expenses. 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 38 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 39 be used to fund continuity of care 40 services, family reimbursed respite, other 41 than personal services and direct housing 42 subsidies for people who are enrolled in 43 OPWDD's self-direction program, provided 44 any or all such costs are identified in a 45 self-direction budget approved by OPWDD. 46 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 47 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the 48 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 49 targeted inflationary increase, for the 50 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 51 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 52 shall not apply any other inflationary 53 increases, cost of living type increases, 54 inflation factors, or trend factors for 55 the purpose of establishing rates of 56 payments, contracts or any other form of S. 10262 43 1 reimbursement; provided that this shall 2 not prevent the commissioner from applying 3 prior adjustments for the purpose of 4 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 5 ing of base year costs. 6 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 7 tion law and any other provision of law, 8 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 9 support staff in programs certified or 10 approved by the office for people with 11 developmental disabilities, including the 12 home and community based services waiver 13 programs that the office for people with 14 developmental disabilities is authorized 15 to administer with federal approval pursu- 16 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 17 the federal social security act, are 18 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 19 may specify when performed under the 20 supervision, training and periodic 21 inspection of a registered professional 22 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 23 practitioner's ordered care. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary, and consistent with 26 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 27 the directors of facilities licensed but 28 not operated by the office for people with 29 developmental disabilities who act as 30 federally-appointed representative payees 31 and who assume management responsibility 32 over the funds of a resident may continue 33 to use such funds for the cost of the 34 resident's care and treatment, consistent 35 with federal law and regulations. 36 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 37 in accordance with the following: 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, funds appropriated herein 40 are available to reimburse in- and 41 out-of-state private residential schools, 42 pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 43 13.37-a and subdivision (g) of section 44 13.38 of the mental hygiene law, for costs 45 of supporting the residential and day 46 program services available to individuals 47 who are over the age of 21 years of age, 48 provided that the amount paid for residen- 49 tial services and/or maintenance costs is 50 net of any supplemental security income 51 benefit to which the individual receiving 52 services is eligible, and provided further 53 that funding for nonresidential services 54 will be in an amount not to exceed the 55 maximum reimbursement for appropriate day 56 services delivered by the office for S. 10262 44 1 people with developmental disabilities 2 certified or approved providers other than 3 in- and out-of-state private residential 4 schools, unless otherwise authorized by 5 the director of the budget. 6 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 7 finance law, section 142 of the economic 8 development law, and article 41 of the 9 mental hygiene law, the commissioner of 10 the office for people with developmental 11 disabilities may make the funds appropri- 12 ated herein available as state aid, a loan 13 or a grant, pursuant to terms and condi- 14 tions established by the commissioner of 15 the office for people with developmental 16 disabilities, to cover a portion of the 17 development costs of private, public 18 and/or non-profit organizations, including 19 corporations and partnerships established 20 pursuant to the private housing finance 21 law and/or any other statutory provisions, 22 for supportive housing units that have 23 been set aside for individuals with intel- 24 lectual and developmental disabilities. 25 Further, the office for people with devel- 26 opmental disabilities shall have a lien on 27 the real property developed with such 28 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be 29 in the amount of the loan or grant, for a 30 maximum term of 30 years, or other longer 31 term consistent with the requirements of 32 another regulatory agency. 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 provision of residential services to 35 people with developmental disabilities 36 (37802) ...................... [40,057,000] 42,988,000 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 provision of day program services to 39 people with developmental disabilities 40 (37803) ....................... [9,840,000] 10,560,000 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 provision of family support services to 43 people with developmental disabilities 44 (37804) ...................... [11,070,000] 11,880,000 45 For services and expenses related to the 46 provision of workshop, day training and 47 employment services to people with devel- 48 opmental disabilities. Notwithstanding any 49 other provision of law, up to [$94,300] 50 $101,200 of this appropriation may be 51 transferred to the New York State Educa- 52 tion Departments' Adult Career and Contin- 53 uing Education Services - Vocational Reha- 54 bilitation (ACCES-VR) program to support 55 the LongTerm Sheltered Employment program S. 10262 45 1 operated by FEDCAP Rehabilitation 2 Services, Inc. (37805) ....... [6,396,000] 6,864,000 3 For other services and expenses provided to 4 people with developmental disabilities 5 including but not limited to hepatitis B, 6 care at home waiver, epilepsy services, 7 Special Olympics New York, Inc. and volun- 8 tary fingerprinting (37806) ... [1,640,000] 1,760,000 9 -------------- 10 § 13. Section 8 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 11 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 111 12 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 14 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 15 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 16 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 17 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 18 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES 19 AID TO LOCALITIES 20 BLIND VETERAN ANNUITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ....................... 385,000 21 -------------- 22 General Fund 23 Local Assistance Account - 10000 24 For payment of annuities to blind veterans 25 and eligible surviving spouses. Up to 26 $15,000 of this appropriation may be 27 transferred to state operations for admin- 28 istrative costs associated with this 29 program (54606) ................................ 385,000 30 -------------- 31 VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM ............. [246,000] 264,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund 35 Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204 36 For services and expenses related to home- 37 less veterans' housing (54815) .. [246,000] 264,000 38 -------------- 39 § 14. No expenditure may be made from any appropriation in this act, 40 until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director of the 41 budget and a copy of such certificate shall have been filed with the 42 state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 43 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee provided, however, 44 that any expenditures from any appropriation in this act made by the 45 legislature or judiciary shall not require such certificate. S. 10262 46 1 § 15. All expenditures and disbursements made against the appropri- 2 ations in this act shall, upon final action by the legislature on appro- 3 priation bills submitted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the 4 state constitution for the support of government for the state fiscal 5 year beginning April 1, 2026, be transferred by the comptroller as 6 expenditures and disbursements to such appropriations for all state 7 departments and agencies, as applicable, in amounts equal to the amounts 8 charged against the appropriations in this act for each such department, 9 agency, and the legislature and the judiciary. 10 § 16. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdi- 11 vision, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 12 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 13 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 14 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 15 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 16 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 17 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 18 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 19 § 17. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 20 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026; provided, 21 however, that upon the transfer of expenditures and disbursements by the 22 comptroller as provided in section fifteen of this act, the appropri- 23 ations made by this act and subject to such section shall be deemed 24 repealed.